Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-157
Fees and charges; manner of payment; deposited in Department of Insurance Cash Fund.

All fees and charges required by Chapter 44 shall be paid in the manner and within the time prescribed by the Director of Insurance as approved by the Tax Commissioner. All such fees and charges, including fees and charges collected pursuant to the retaliatory statutes of such chapter, which are in excess of or in addition to the fees and charges collected pursuant to such chapter, shall be deposited by the State Treasurer to the account of and for the use of the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to be appropriated and expended for the supervision, control, and regulation of the business of insurance in Nebraska. If payment of any such fee or charge is not made within the time prescribed, as approved, the director shall report such failure or neglect to the Attorney General who shall institute an action in the name of the State of Nebraska for the purpose of recovering the money due. All fees and charges of any nature whatsoever which are paid to the Department of Insurance or to the Director of Insurance by virtue of his or her office shall be paid forthwith into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer to the Department of Insurance Cash Fund.

Laws 1955, c. 168, § 13, p. 483;

Laws 1965, c. 251, § 2, p. 710;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 40.